District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.05

Amendment of articles of nonmembership corporation.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the board of directors of a nonmembership corporation may adopt amendments to the corporation’s articles. Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, an amendment adopted by the board of directors under this subsection shall also be approved:

(1)

By a designated body whose approval is required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws;

(2)

If the amendment changes or deletes a provision regarding the appointment of a director by persons other than the board, by those persons as if they constituted a voting group; and

(3)

If the amendment changes or deletes a provision regarding the designation of a director, by the individual designated at the time as that director.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-407.02, § 29-408.03, and § 29-409.02.